California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
  ARTICLE 4. Exemption Certificates [6421. - 6423.]

6421.

(a) If a purchaser certifies in writing to a seller that the property purchased will be used in a manner or for a purpose entitling the seller to regard the gross receipts from the sale as exempted by this chapter from the computation of the amount of the sales tax, and uses the property in some other manner or for some other purpose, the purchaser shall be liable for payment of sales tax as if he were a retailer making a retail sale of the property at the time of such use, and the cost of the property to him shall be deemed the gross receipts from such retail sale. The certificate shall relieve the seller from liability for the
 sales tax only if it is taken in good faith.

(b) For purposes of this section, “use” is the same as defined in Section 6009 without the exclusion defined in Section 6009.1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 654, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

6422.1.

The board may provide for exemption certificates and other tax clearance certificates to be issued by it or by retailers selling vehicles as defined in Article 1 (commencing with Section 6271) of Chapter 3.5, commercial coaches as defined in Section 18001.8 of the Health and Safety Code or mobilehomes as defined by Section 18008 of the Health and Safety Code. The certificates shall be used to allow a completion of registration of a vehicle by the Department of Motor Vehicles or a commercial coach or mobilehome by the Department of Housing and Community Development. The certificates may indicate that the board finds that no use tax is due or is
 likely to become due with respect to the storage, use, or other consumption of the vehicle, commercial coach, or mobilehome, or that the tax has been paid or is to be paid in a manner not requiring the withholding of a registration or transfer of registration. The certificates shall be in such form as the board may prescribe and shall be executed, issued and accepted for clearance of registration on such conditions as the board may prescribe. The issuance, alteration, forgery, or use of any such certificate in a manner contrary to the requirements of the board constitutes a misdemeanor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 144, Sec. 190.)
-------------------------------------------

6423.

(a) A purchaser certifying under subparagraph (B) of paragraph (4) of subdivision (c) of Section 6011 or subparagraph (B) of paragraph (4) of subdivision (c) of Section 6012 that he or she is entitled to either a direct refund or credit against his or her income tax for the federal excise tax paid shall do so in a form prescribed by the board.

(b) If the purchaser provides the certificate referred to in subdivision (a) and uses the fuel in a manner that does not entitle the purchaser to a direct refund or credit against his or her income tax for the federal excise
 tax paid or if the purchaser does not receive such a refund or credit, the purchaser shall be liable for sales or use tax measured by the amount of federal excise tax paid to the extent the seller has not remitted sales or use tax measured by that amount. The certificate shall relieve the seller from liability for any sales or use tax due only if it is taken in good faith.

(c) Any person, including any officer or employee of a corporation, who certifies under subparagraph (B) of paragraph (4) of subdivision (c) of Section 6011 or subparagraph (B) of paragraph (4) of subdivision (c) of Section 6012 that he or she is entitled to either a direct refund or credit against his or her income tax for the federal excise tax paid on fuel when that person knows at the time of purchase that he or she shall not be entitled to the refund or credit is liable to the state for the amount of sales or use tax that would be due if he or she had not so certified.
 In addition to the tax, interest, and other penalties, the person shall be liable to the state for a penalty of 10 percent of the tax or five hundred dollars ($500), whichever is greater, for purchases made for personal gain or to evade payment of taxes.

(d) Any person, including any officer or employee of a corporation, who, for the purpose of evading payment to the seller of a portion of the tax applicable to the transaction, certifies under subparagraph (B) of paragraph (4) of subdivision (c) of Section 6011 or subparagraph (B) of paragraph (4) of subdivision (c) of Section 6012 that he or she is entitled to either a direct refund or credit against his or her income tax for the federal excise tax paid on fuel when that person knows at the time of purchase that he or she is not entitled to such a refund or credit is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable as provided in Section 7153.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 654, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Determinations [6451. - 6597.]



  ARTICLE 1. Returns and Payments [6451. - 6459.5.]

6451.

The taxes imposed by this part are due and payable to the board quarterly on or before the last day of the month next succeeding each quarterly period.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1947, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------

6452.

(a) On or before the last day of the month following each quarterly period of three months, a return for the preceding quarterly period shall be filed with the board in the form as prescribed by the board, which may include, but not be limited to, electronic media. Returns shall be authenticated in a form or pursuant to methods as may be prescribed by the board.

(b) For purposes of the sales tax, a return shall be filed by every seller and also by every person who is liable
 for the sales tax under this part. For purposes of the use tax, a return shall be filed by every retailer engaged in business in this state and by every person purchasing tangible personal property, the storage, use, or other consumption of which is subject to the use tax, who has not paid the use tax due to a retailer required to collect the tax.

(c) Any retailer or other person who fails or refuses to furnish any return required to be made, or who fails or refuses to furnish a supplemental return or other data required by the board, is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable as provided in Section 7153.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 923, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

6452.05.

(a) Beginning January 1, 2020, on or before the last day of the month next following each quarterly period, in addition to the returns due pursuant to Section 6452, a retailer of aircraft jet fuel shall provide a quarterly information return, in the form prescribed by the department, which may include, but not be limited to, electronic media showing the information required for this state to comply with the Federal Aviation Administration’s “Policy and Procedures Concerning the Use of Airport Revenue; Proceeds from Taxes on Aviation Fuel” (79 Fed. Reg. 66282 (Nov. 7, 2014)), as it read on November 7, 2014, and any other information that the department determines to be necessary to comply with those policies and procedures.

(b) A retailer of
 aircraft jet fuel who fails or refuses to timely furnish an information return, or other data required by the department pursuant to subdivision (a), shall pay a penalty of five thousand dollars ($5,000).

(c) The information return required under this section shall not include any tax remittance and does not constitute a return required under Section 6452.

(d) The department shall collect information from the returns filed pursuant to subdivision (a) and shall post the following information each quarter on the department’s internet website:

(1) The amount of reported revenue derived from the sale, storage, use, or consumption of aircraft jet fuel in the state from taxes imposed pursuant to Section 35 of Article XIII of the California Constitution and Sections 6051.2, 6051.3, 6201.2, and 6201.3 of this code.

(2) The amount of reported revenue derived from the sale, storage, use, or consumption of aircraft jet fuel with respect to taxes imposed by a city, county, city and county, or other governmental entity in accordance with the Transactions and Use Tax Law (Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251)), for the purposes of local compliance with the Federal Aviation Administration’s “Policy and Procedures Concerning the Use of Airport Revenue; Proceeds from Taxes on Aviation Fuel” (79 Fed. Reg. 66282 (Nov. 7, 2014)), as it read on November 7, 2014.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 17, Sec. 6.   (AB 90)   Effective June 29, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

6452.1.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 6451, every person that purchases tangible personal property, the storage, use, or other consumption of which is subject to qualified use tax, as defined in subdivision (d), that is otherwise required to report and remit that tax pursuant to this part, may elect to report and remit qualified use tax on an acceptable tax return.

(b) (1) A person that reports qualified use tax on an acceptable tax return is deemed to have made the election authorized by this section.

(2) (A) In the case of a married individual filing a separate California personal income tax return, an election may be made to report either one-half of the qualified use tax or the entire qualified use tax on his or her separate California personal income tax return.

(B) If an individual elects to report one-half of the qualified use tax, that election will not be binding with respect to the remaining one-half of the qualified use tax owed by that individual and that individual’s spouse.

(c) An election to report qualified use tax on an acceptable tax return shall be irrevocable. An acceptable tax return that contains use
 tax shall be considered a tax return for purposes of this part.

(d) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Acceptable tax return” means an original return that is filed pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 18501) and Article 2 (commencing with Section 18601) of Chapter 2 of Part 10.2, Section 18633 or 18633.5, or Article 3 (commencing with Section 23771) of Chapter 4 of Part 11.

(2) (A) Except as provided in subparagraph (B), “qualified use tax” means either of the following:

(i) For one or more single nonbusiness purchases of individual items of tangible personal property each with a sales price of less than one thousand dollars ($1,000), either of the following:

(I) The use tax imposed under this part, Article XIII of the California Constitution, in conformity with the Bradley-Burns Uniform Local Sales and Use Tax Law (Part 1.5 (commencing with Section 7200)), or in accordance with the Transactions and Use Tax Law (Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251)) that has not been paid to a retailer holding a seller’s permit or certificate of registration-use tax.

(II) The estimated amount of use tax as calculated by the board. The board shall annually calculate the estimated amount of use tax due according to a person’s adjusted gross income and by July 30 of each calendar year make available to the Franchise Tax Board those amounts in the form of a use tax table as part of the accompanying instructions of the acceptable tax return.

(ii) For one or more single nonbusiness purchases of individual items of tangible personal property
 each with a sales price of one thousand dollars ($1,000) or more, or for any tangible personal property purchased for use in a trade or business, the amount of use tax imposed under this part, Article XIII of the California Constitution, the Bradley-Burns Uniform Local Sales and Use Tax Law (Part 1.5 (commencing with Section 7200)), or the Transactions and Use Tax Law (Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251)) that has not been paid to a retailer holding a seller’s permit or certificate of registration-use tax.

(B) “Qualified use tax” does not include:

(i) Use tax imposed on the storage, use, or other consumption of a mobilehome or a commercial coach that is required to be registered annually pursuant to the Health and Safety Code or use tax imposed on the storage, use, or other consumption of a vehicle subject to identification under Division 16.5 (commencing with Section 38000)
 of the Vehicle Code, or a vehicle that qualifies under the permanent trailer identification plate program pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 5014.1 of the Vehicle Code.

(ii) Use tax imposed on the storage, use, or other consumption of a vehicle, vessel, or aircraft.

(iii) Use tax imposed on a lease of tangible personal property.

(iv) Use tax imposed on the storage, use, or other consumption of cigarettes, tobacco products, or cigarettes and tobacco products for which the purchaser is registered with the board as a cigarette consumer, a tobacco products consumer, or a cigarette and tobacco products consumer.

(e) (1) If a person elects to report qualified use tax on an acceptable tax return, that person shall report and remit the
 qualified use tax by reporting the amount due based on all taxable purchases of tangible personal property made during the taxable year for which the acceptable tax return is required to be filed. A person that has made one or more single nonbusiness purchases of individual items of tangible personal property each with a sales price of less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) may satisfy his or her tax liability for those purchases by using the use tax table shown in the accompanying instructions of the acceptable tax return.

(2) The qualified use tax shall be reported on and remitted with an acceptable tax return that is required to be filed for the taxable year in which the liability for the qualified use tax was incurred.

(f) (1) The penalties and interest imposed under this part, in conformity with the Bradley-Burns Uniform Local Sales and Use Tax Law
 (Part 1.5 (commencing with Section 7200)), or in accordance with the Transactions and Use Tax Law (Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251)) shall apply to use tax reported as qualified use tax on an acceptable return.

(2) Any claims for refunds or credits of any use tax reported as qualified use tax on an acceptable tax return shall be made in accordance with Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 6901) of this part.

(3) Qualified use tax shall be considered to be timely reported and remitted for purposes of this part, in conformity with the Bradley-Burns Uniform Local Sales and Use Tax Law (Part 1.5 (commencing with Section 7200)), and in accordance with the Transactions and Use Tax Law (Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251)), if the qualified use tax is reported on and remitted with an acceptable tax return in accordance with the provisions of this section.

(g) Notwithstanding a person’s payment of qualified use tax on an acceptable tax return, the board is not precluded from making any determinations for understatements of qualified use tax against that person in accordance with this chapter. However, with respect to one or more single nonbusiness purchases of individual items of tangible personal property each with a sales price of less than one thousand dollars ($1,000), the board shall be precluded from making any such determination against any person who uses the use tax table for purposes of satisfying his or her use tax liability when the person uses that table in accordance with the accompanying instructions.

(h) (1) Of payments and credits shown on the return, together with any other credits associated with that person’s tax year, of a person that reports qualified use tax on an acceptable tax return, an
 amount equal to the qualified use tax liability reported on that acceptable tax return in accordance with this section shall be applied to that liability.

(2) This subdivision shall apply to purchases of tangible personal property made on or after January 1, 2015, in taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2015.

(i) (1) This section does not apply to a person who is otherwise required to hold a seller’s permit or to register with the State Board of Equalization pursuant to Part 1 (commencing with Section 6001) of this division.

(2) Except as otherwise provided, this section applies to purchases of tangible personal property made on or after January 1, 2010, in taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2010.

(3) The
 amendments made by Chapter 14 of the Statutes of 2011 shall apply to purchases of tangible personal property made on or after January 1, 2011, in taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2011.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 175, Sec. 1.   (AB 1717)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

6452.2.

(a) For reporting periods beginning on or after January 1, 2012, notwithstanding Section 6451 and subdivision (b) of Section 6455, the qualified use tax of an eligible purchaser, as defined in this section, is due and payable to the board on or before April 15 following the close of the calendar year in which the liability for use tax was incurred.

(b) “Eligible purchaser” means a person that
 purchases tangible personal property, the storage, use, or other consumption of which is subject to qualified use tax, as defined in this section, and that is either of the following:

(1) Eligible to report use tax on an acceptable tax return, but does not elect to do so.

(2) Not required to file an acceptable tax return pursuant to Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) or Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001), and that is not a holder of a use tax direct payment permit as described in Section 7051.3 or is not otherwise registered or required to be registered with the board to report sales or use tax.

(c) “Qualified use tax” for purposes of this section, means the amount of use tax imposed under this part, Article XIII of the California Constitution, in conformity with the Bradley-Burns Uniform Local Sales and
 Use Tax Law (Part 1.5 (commencing with Section 7200)), or in accordance with the Transactions and Use Tax Law (Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251)) that has not been paid to a retailer holding a seller’s permit or certificate of registration-use tax. “Qualified use tax” does not include the use tax described in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 6452.1.

(d) “Acceptable tax return” has the same meaning as that term is used in paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of Section 6452.1.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 200, Sec. 1.   (AB 2270)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

6453.

For purposes of the sales tax, the return shall show the gross receipts of the seller during the preceding reporting period and, in the case of a person who is liable for the sales tax and is not a seller, the gross receipts of such person for the period in which the liability was incurred. For purposes of the use tax, in case of a return filed by a retailer, the return shall show the total sales price of the property sold
 by him or her, the storage, use, or consumption of which property became subject to the use tax during the preceding reporting period; in case of a return filed by a purchaser, except as provided in Section 6452.1, the return shall show the total sales price of the property purchased by him or her, the storage, use, or consumption of which became subject to the use tax during the preceding reporting period.

The return shall also show the amount of the taxes for the period covered by the return and any other information which the board deems necessary for the proper administration of this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 721, Sec. 3.   (SB 858)   Effective October 19, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

6454.

Except as provided in Sections 6479.3 and 6479.31, a person required to file the return shall deliver the return together with a remittance of the amount of the tax due to the office of the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 865, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

6455.

(a) The board, if it deems it necessary in order to insure payment to or facilitate the collection by the state of the amount of taxes, may require returns and payment of the amount of taxes for quarterly periods other than calendar quarters depending upon the principal place of business of the seller, retailer or purchaser as the case may be, or for designated periods other than quarterly periods.

(b) On or before the last day of the month following each designated period, a return for the preceding designated period shall be filed with the board in such form as
 the board may prescribe.

(c) Any retailer or other person who fails or refuses to furnish any return required by law to be made, or who fails or refuses to furnish a supplemental return or other data required by the board, is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable as provided in Section 7153.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1361, Sec. 14.)
-------------------------------------------

6456.

(a) Under regulations prescribed by the board, if: (1) A tax liability under this part was understated by a failure to file a return required to be filed under this part, by the omission of an amount properly includable therein, or by erroneous deductions or credits claimed on a return, and the understatement of tax liability is attributable to one spouse; or any amount of the tax reported on a return was unpaid and the nonpayment
 of the reported tax liability is attributable to one spouse,(2) The other spouse establishes that he or she did not know of, and had no reason to know of, that understatement or nonpayment, and(3) Taking into account whether or not the other spouse significantly benefited directly or indirectly from the understatement or the nonpayment and taking into account all other facts and circumstances, it is inequitable to hold the other spouse liable for the deficiency in tax attributable to that understatement or nonpayment,then the other spouse shall be relieved of liability for tax (including interest, penalties, and other amounts) to the extent that the liability is attributable to that understatement or nonpayment of tax.

(b) For purposes of this section, the determination of the spouse to whom items of understatement or nonpayment are attributable shall be made without regard to community property laws.

(c) This section shall apply to all calendar quarters subject to the provisions of this part, but shall not apply to any calendar quarter that is more than five years from the final date on the board-issued determination, five years from the return due date for nonpayment on a return, or one year from the first contact with the spouse making a claim under this section; or that has been closed by res judicata, whichever is later.

(d) For purposes of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), “reason to know” means whether or not a reasonably prudent person would have had reason to know of the understatement or nonpayment.

(e) For purposes of this section, with respect to a failure to file a return or an omission of an item from the return, “attributable to one spouse” may be determined by whether a spouse rendered substantial service as a retailer of taxable items to which the understatement is attributable. If neither spouse rendered substantial services as a retailer, then the attribution of applicable items of understatement shall be treated as community property. An erroneous deduction or credit shall be attributable to the spouse who caused that deduction or credit to be entered on the return.

(f) Under procedures prescribed by the board, if, taking into account all the facts and circumstances, it is inequitable to hold the other spouse liable for any unpaid tax or any deficiency (or any portion of either) attributable to any item for which relief is not available under subdivision (a), the board
 may relieve the other spouse of that liability.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1052, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

6457.

Section 6453 shall not be applicable with respect to a lease of tangible personal property, but the lessor shall report the rentals paid by the lessee during the preceding reporting period; a lessee shall report the rentals payable in the preceding reporting period upon which tax has not been paid to his lessor required to collect the tax. The return shall also show the amount of the taxes for the period covered by the return and such other information as the board deems necessary for the proper administration of this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

6459.

(a) (1) Except as provided in subdivisions (b) and (c), the board for good cause may extend for not to exceed one month the time for making any return or paying any amount required to be paid under this part. The extension may be granted at any time provided a request therefor is filed with the board within
 or prior to the period for which the extension may be granted.

(2) Any person to whom an extension is granted shall pay, in addition to the tax, interest at the modified adjusted rate per month, or fraction thereof, established pursuant to Section 6591.5, from the date on which the tax would have been due without the extension until the date of payment.

(b) (1) The board may grant an extension for more than one month if both of the following conditions occur:

(A) A budget for the state has not been adopted by July 1.

(B) The person requesting the extension is a creditor of the state who has not been paid because of the state’s failure to timely adopt a budget.

(2) Any
 extension granted under this subdivision shall expire no later than the last day of the month following the month in which the budget is adopted or one month from the due date of the return or payment, whichever comes later.

(3) Any person to whom an extension has been granted under this subdivision shall pay, in addition to the tax, interest at the modified adjusted rate per month, or fraction thereof, established pursuant to Section 6591.5, from the date on which the tax would have been due without the extension until the date of payment. However, no interest shall be due on that portion of the payment equivalent to the amount due to the person from the state on the due date of the payment.

(c) (1) In the case of a disaster, the board, for a period not to exceed three months, may extend the time for making any report or return or paying any tax required
 under this part. The extension may be granted at any time provided a request therefor is filed with the board within or before the period for which the extension may be granted.

(2) Any person to whom an extension is granted shall pay, in addition to the tax, interest at the modified adjusted rate per month, or fraction thereof, established pursuant to Section 6591.5, from the date on which the tax would have been due without the extension until the date of payment.

(3) For purposes of this section, “disaster” means fire, flood, storm, tidal wave, earthquake, or similar public calamity, whether or not resulting from natural causes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 257, Sec. 1.   (AB 1559)   Effective September 9, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

6459.5.

(a) Subject to subdivision (c), if the Governor issues a state of emergency proclamation, the department may extend the time, for a period not to exceed three months, for making any report or return or paying any tax required under this part for any person in an area identified in the state of emergency proclamation.

(b) If the department makes an extension pursuant to subdivision (a), any person in an area identified in a state of emergency proclamation shall not be required to file a request for the extension. 

(c) The department may make the extension in subdivision (a) only during the first 12 months following the issuance of the state of emergency proclamation or the duration
 of the state of emergency, whichever is less.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 474, Sec. 3.   (SB 1496)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 1.1. Prepayment [6470. - 6479.]

6470.

The provisions of this article do not apply to persons filing returns for other than quarterly periods. The provisions of this article apply to taxes imposed under ordinances adopted pursuant to Part 1.5 (commencing with Section 7200), Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251), or Article 2 (commencing with Section 37021) of Part 17 of this division in the same manner and to the same extent that the provisions of this article apply to taxes imposed under this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 24.)
-------------------------------------------

6471.

(a) Upon written notification by the board, any person whose estimated measure of tax liability under this part averages
 seventeen thousand dollars ($17,000) or more per month, as determined by the board, shall, without regard to the measure of tax in any one month, make prepayments as prescribed in this section.

(1) In the first, third, and fourth calendar quarters, the person shall prepay not less than 90 percent of the amount of state and local tax liability for each of the first two monthly periods of each quarterly period.

(2) In the second calendar quarter, the person shall make a first prepayment of 90 percent of the amount of state and local tax liability for the first monthly period of the quarterly period and a second prepayment of either of the following:

(A) Ninety percent of the amount of state and local tax liability for the second monthly period of the quarterly period, plus 90 percent of the amount of state and local
 tax liability for the first 15 days of the third monthly period of the quarterly period.

(B) Ninety percent of the amount of state and local tax liability for the second monthly period of the quarterly period, plus 50 percent of 90 percent of the amount of state and local tax liability for the second monthly period of the quarterly period.

(b) Persons engaged in their present business during all of the corresponding quarterly period of the preceding year, or persons who are successors to a business that was in operation during all of that quarterly period, may satisfy the above monthly prepayment requirements for the first, third, and fourth calendar quarters by payment of an amount equal to one-third of the measure of tax liability reported on the return or returns filed for that quarterly period of the preceding year multiplied by the state and local tax rate in effect during
 the month for which the prepayment is made.

These persons may satisfy their prepayment requirements for the second calendar quarter by making a first prepayment of an amount equal to one-third of the measure of tax liability reported, and a second prepayment of an amount equal to one-half of the measure of tax liability reported, on the return or returns filed for that quarterly period of the preceding year multiplied by the state and local tax rate in effect during the month for which the prepayment is made.

Prepayments shall be made during the quarterly periods designated by the board and during each succeeding quarterly period until further notified in writing by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 135, Sec. 151.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

6471.4.

Any person required to make prepayment pursuant to Article 1.5 (commencing with Section 6480) may not be required to make additional prepayment pursuant to this article, provided that more than 75 percent of the gross receipts of that person are from the retail sale of motor vehicle fuel, diesel fuel, aircraft jet fuel, or any combination of those fuels.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 429, Sec. 1.   Effective October 2, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 78 of Ch. 429.)
-------------------------------------------

6471.6.

The department, in its discretion, may relieve any person from the requirement to make prepayments pursuant to Section 6471 if both of the following apply:

(a) The person is a dealer required to pay any sales or use tax, as applicable, to the Department of Motor Vehicles pursuant to Section 6295.

(b) During the prior calendar year, more than 75 percent of the gross receipts of that person are from retail sales of motor vehicles required to be registered under the Vehicle Code, except for a recreational vehicle that is either truck-mounted, permanently towable on the highways without a permit, or a park trailer, as those terms are defined in Section 18010 of the Health and Safety
 Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 499, Sec. 1.   (SB 1528)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

6472.

Except in the case of persons required to
 remit amounts due in accordance with Article 1.2 (commencing with Section 6479.3), for purposes of Section 6471, a prepayment shall be accompanied by a report of the amount of the prepayment in a form prescribed by the board and shall be made to the board as follows:

(a) In the first, third, and fourth calendar quarters, on or before the 24th day next following the end of each of the first two monthly periods of each quarterly period. 

(b) In the second calendar quarter, as follows:

(1) The first prepayment on or before the 24th day next following the end of the first monthly period of the quarterly period.

(2) The second prepayment on or before the 24th day of the third monthly period of the quarterly period for the second monthly period and the first
 15 days of the third monthly period of the quarterly period.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 135, Sec. 152.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

6473.

The amount of the prepayment shall constitute a credit against the amount of the taxes due and payable for the quarterly period in which the prepayment became due.

(History: Added by Stats. 1966, Ch. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

6474.

In determining whether a person’s estimated measure of tax liability averages seventeen thousand dollars ($17,000) or more per month for purposes of Section 6471.5, the board may consider tax returns filed pursuant to this part as well as any information in the board’s possession or which may come into its possession.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 6474.5 by Stats. 1985, Ch. 106, Sec. 125.   Note: The amendment by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1144, did not become operative because the conditions in Sec. 8 of Ch. 1144 failed.)
-------------------------------------------

6476.

Any person required to make a prepayment pursuant to Section 6471 who fails to make a timely prepayment but makes such prepayment before the last day of the monthly period following the quarterly period in which the prepayment became due, shall also pay a penalty of 6 percent of the amount of prepayment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1966, Ch. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

6477.

Any person required to make a prepayment pursuant to Section 6471 or Section 6471.5 who fails to make a prepayment before the last day of the monthly period following the quarterly period in which the prepayment became due and who files a timely return and payment for the quarterly period in which the prepayment became due shall
 pay a penalty of 6 percent of the amount equal to 90 percent of the tax liability, as prescribed in those sections, for each of the periods during that quarterly period for which a required prepayment was not made.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 337) by Stats. 1999, Ch. 484, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Note: The earlier amendment by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1144, conclusively failed to become operative under conditions in Sec. 8 of Ch. 1144.)
-------------------------------------------

6478.

(a) If a failure to make a prepayment as described in Section 6477 is due to negligence or intentional disregard of this part or authorized rules and regulations, the penalty shall be 10 percent instead of 6 percent.

(b) If any part of a deficiency in prepayment is due to negligence or intentional disregard of this part or authorized rules and regulations, a penalty of 10 percent of the deficiency shall be paid.

(c) The provisions of this section shall not apply to amounts subject to the provisions of Sections 6484, 6485, 6511, 6514, and 6591.

(d) The 10 percent negligence penalty shall become due and payable and shall be ascertained and determined in the same manner as the deficiency determination under Article 2 (commencing with Section 6481) of this chapter. The provisions of Article 5 (commencing with Section 6561) of this chapter shall be applicable with respect to the finality of the determination and the right to petition for redetermination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 342, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

6479.

Notification by the board, provided for in Section 6471, may be served personally or by mail in the manner prescribed in Section 6486 for service of notice of a deficiency determination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 610.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 1.2. Payment by Electronic Funds Transfer [6479.3. - 6479.5.]

6479.3.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (k), any person whose estimated tax liability under this part averages ten thousand dollars ($10,000) or more per month, as determined by the department pursuant to methods of calculation prescribed by the department, shall remit amounts due by an electronic funds transfer under procedures prescribed by the department. Any person who collects use tax on a voluntary basis is not required to remit amounts due by electronic funds transfer.

(b) Any person whose estimated tax liability under this part averages less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per month or any person who voluntarily collects use tax may elect to remit amounts due by electronic funds transfer with the approval of the department.

(c) Any person remitting amounts due pursuant to subdivision (a) or (b) shall perform electronic funds transfer in compliance with the due dates set forth in Article 1 (commencing with Section 6451) and Article 1.1 (commencing with Section 6470). Payment is deemed complete on the date the electronic funds transfer is initiated, if settlement to the state’s demand account occurs on or before the banking day following the date the transfer is initiated. If settlement to the state’s demand account does not occur on or before the banking day following the date the transfer is initiated, payment is deemed to occur on the date settlement occurs.

(d) Any person remitting taxes by electronic funds transfer shall, on or before the due date of the remittance, file a return for the preceding reporting period in the form and manner prescribed by the department. Any person who fails to timely
 file the required return shall pay a penalty of 10 percent of the amount of taxes, exclusive of prepayments, with respect to the period for which the return is required.

(e) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), any person required to remit taxes pursuant to this article who remits those taxes by means other than appropriate electronic funds transfer shall pay a penalty of 10 percent of the taxes incorrectly remitted.

(2) A person required to remit prepayments pursuant to this article who remits a prepayment by means other than an appropriate electronic funds transfer shall pay a penalty of 6 percent of the prepayment amount incorrectly remitted.
